Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7460.01
Reporting and investigation duties.

Every wholesale drug distributor licensed under the Wholesale Drug Distributor Licensing Act shall be subject to and comply with sections 38-1,124 to 38-1,126 relating to reporting and investigations.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1297.